Vermont statutes. Title 19 Highways
Subchapter 3. Materials and Machines

§ 916.
Obtaining gravel within road limits.

A town may take gravel, earth, stone, or other material, needed to repair or build highways, that lies within the limits of the highway, whether the material is to be used at the place where taken or elsewhere on town highways.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.